en: Confetti
xx: Confetti
cs: Konfety
da: Konfetti
de: Konfetti
es: Confeti
fr: Confettis
it: Coriandoli
ja: 紙吹雪
nl: Confetti
no: Konfetti
pl: Konfetti
pt: Confetes
ru: Конфетти
sv: Konfetti
tr: Konfetiler

en: Decorative Pom-Poms
xx: Decorative Pom-Poms
cs: Papírové koule\, pom poms
da: Papirpomponer
de: Dekorative Pompons
es: Pompones decorativos
fr: Pompons décoratifs
it: Pon-pon decorativi
ja: 装飾用ポンポン
nl: Decoratieve pompons
no: Papirpomponger
pl: Pompony ozdobne
pt: Pompons decorativos
ru: Декоративные помпоны
sv: Dekorationspompom
tr: Dekoratif Ponponlar

en: Drinking Games
xx: Drinking Games
cs: Alkoholické hry
da: Drikkespil
de: Trinkspiele
es: Juegos para beber
fr: Jeux à boire
it: Giochi alcolici
ja: ドリンクゲーム
nl: Drinkspellen
no: Drikkeleker
pl: Zabawy związane z piciem alkoholu
pt: Jogos de bebidas
ru: Игры с выпивкой
sv: Dryckesspel
tr: İçki Masası Oyunları

en: Beer Pong
xx: Beer Pong
cs: Pivní ping pong
da: Ølpong
de: Bierpong
es: Beer Pong
fr: Bière-pong
it: Birra pong
ja: ビアポン
nl: Beerpong
no: Øl-pong
pl: Piwny ping-pong
pt: Beer Pong
ru: Пивной понг
sv: Ölpingis
tr: Bira Sebilleri

en: Beer Pong Tables
xx: Beer Pong Tables
cs: Stoly na pivní ping pong
da: Ølpongborde
de: Bierpong-Tische
es: Mesas de beer pong
fr: Tables de jeu de bière-pong
it: Tavoli per birra pong
ja: ビアポンテーブル
nl: Beerpongtafels
no: Øl-pongbord
pl: Stoły do piwnego ping-ponga
pt: Mesas de beer pong
ru: Столы для игры в пивной понг
sv: Ölpingisbord
tr: Bira Sebili Sehpaları

en: Drinking Straws & Stirrers
xx: Drinking Straws & Stirrers
cs: Brčka a míchadla
da: Sugerør og rørepinde
de: Trinkhalme & Rührer
es: Pajitas y agitadores
fr: Pailles et agitateurs à cocktail
it: Cannucce e mescolatori
ja: ストロー・マドラー
nl: Drinkrietjes en roerlepels
no: Sugerør og røreverktøy
pl: Słomki do picia i mieszadełka
pt: Canudos e mexedores de bebida
ru: Соломинки
sv: Sugrör och omrörare
tr: İçecek Kamış ve Karıştırıcıları

en: Drinking straws
ar: شفاطة
ca: Palla
cs: Slámka
cy: Gwelltyn yfed
da: Sugerør
de: Strohhalm
el: Καλαμάκι πόσης
eo: Trinkŝalmo
es: Pajilla
et: Joogikõrs
eu: Pajita
fa: نی‌ نوشیدنی
fi: Pilli
fr: Paille
hr: Slamčica
hu: Szívószál
hy: Խմելու ձողիկ
id: Sedotan
it: Cannuccia
ja: ストロー
jv: Sedhotan
ka: Კოქტეილის ჩხირი
ko: 빨대
lb: Stréihallem
lt: Šiaudelis
mk: Сламка
ms: Penyedut minuman
nb: Sugerør
nl: Rietje
nn: Sugerøyr
pl: Słomka
pt: Canudo
ro: Pai
ru: Соломинка
sc: Cannita
sh: Slamčica
sk: Slamka
sl: Slamica
sq: Pipëz kashte
sr: Сламчица
ss: Umbhobho wekunatsa
sv: Sugrör
sw: Mrija
th: หลอดดูด
tr: Pipet
uk: Соломинка
vi: Ống hút
zh: 吸管

en: Plastic drinking straws
da: Plastiksugerør
sv: Plastsugrör

en: Metal drinking straws
da: Metalsugerør
sv: Metallsugrör

en: Paper drinking straws
da: Papirssugerør
sv: Papperssugrör

en: Envelope Seals
xx: Envelope Seals
cs: Pečeti na obálky
da: Konvolutsegl
de: Briefsiegel
es: Sellos\, lacres y pegatinas
fr: Cachets d'enveloppe
it: Sigilli per buste
ja: 封印シール
nl: Sluitzegels
no: Konvoluttsegl
pl: Pieczęcie na koperty
pt: Selos de envelope
ru: Наклейки для запечатывания конвертов
sv: Sigill till kuvert
tr: Zarf Mühürleri

en: Event Programs
xx: Event Programs
cs: Programy oslav a události
da: Programmer til arrangementer
de: Eventprogramme
es: Programas de eventos
fr: Programmes d'événements
it: Programmi di eventi
ja: イベントプログラム
nl: Evenementenprogramma's
no: Arrangementprogrammer
pl: Programy wydarzeń
pt: Programas de eventos
ru: Программы мероприятий
sv: Programblad
tr: Etkinlik Programları

en: Fireworks & Firecrackers
xx: Fireworks & Firecrackers
cs: Ohňostroje a petardy
da: Fyrværkeri
de: Feuerwerkskörper
es: Petardos y fuegos artificiales
fr: Feux d'artifice et pétards
it: Fuochi d'artificio e petardi
ja: 花火・爆竹
nl: Vuurwerk en rotjes
no: Fyrverkeri og kinaputter
pl: Sztuczne ognie i petardy
pt: Fogos de artifício e traques
ru: Фейерверки и петарды
sv: Fyrverkeripjäser och smällare
tr: Havai Fişekler ve Maytaplar

en: Inflatable Party Decorations
xx: Inflatable Party Decorations
cs: Nafukovací dekorace na párty
da: Oppustelig festudsmykning
de: Aufblasbare Partydeko
es: Decoraciones hinchables para fiestas
fr: Décorations de fête gonflables
it: Decorazioni gonfiabili per feste
ja: パーティ用エアディスプレイ
nl: Opblaasbare feestdecoraties
no: Oppblåsbar festpynt
pl: Nadmuchiwane dekoracje okolicznościowe
pt: Enfeites infláveis para festas
ru: Надувные украшения для вечеринок
sv: Uppblåsbara festdekorationer
tr: Şişme Parti Dekorları

en: Invitations
xx: Invitations
cs: Pozvánky
da: Invitationer
de: Einladungskarten
es: Invitaciones
fr: Invitations
it: Inviti
ja: 招待状
nl: Uitnodigingen
no: Invitasjoner
pl: Zaproszenia
pt: Convites
ru: Приглашения
sv: Inbjudningskort
tr: Davetiyeler

en: Noisemakers & Party Blowers
xx: Noisemakers & Party Blowers
cs: Řehtačky a frkačky
da: Truthorn
de: Tröten\, Luftrüssel & Krachmacher
es: Matasuegras y petardos
fr: Sifflets et langues de belle-mère
it: Strumenti che fanno rumore/trombette
ja: クラッカー・吹き戻し
nl: Ratels en roltongen
no: Festhorn og støymakere
pl: Trąbki i piszczałki na przyjęcia
pt: Matracas e línguas de sogra
ru: Трещотки и свистки
sv: Tutor och flärpor
tr: Parti Düdükleri

en: Party Favors
xx: Party Favors
cs: Dárečky pro hosty
da: Værtindegave
de: Partyartikel
es: Artículos para fiestas
fr: Petits cadeaux de fête
it: Tutto per la festa
ja: パーティー用プチギフト
nl: Feestattenties
no: Festrosetter
pl: Upominki dla gości
pt: Lembrancinhas de festa
ru: Сувениры для вечеринок
sv: Presenter till festdeltagare
tr: Parti Eşantiyonları

en: Wedding Favors
xx: Wedding Favors
cs: Svatební výslužky
da: Bryllupsgave
de: Kleine Geschenke für Hochzeitsgäste
es: Recordatorios de boda
fr: Cadeaux de mariage pour invités
it: Bomboniere
ja: 結婚式用プチギフト
nl: Huwelijksattenties
no: Bryllupsrosetter
pl: Upominki dla gości weselnych
pt: Lembrancinhas de casamento
ru: Свадебные сувениры
sv: Presenter till bröllopsgäster
tr: Düğün Eşantiyonları

en: Party Games
xx: Party Games
cs: Hry na večírky
da: Festspil
de: Partyspiele
es: Juegos para fiestas
fr: Jeux de fête
it: Giochi per feste
ja: パーティーゲーム
nl: Feestspellen
no: Selskapsleker
pl: Gry na przyjęcia
pt: Jogos de festa
ru: Игры для вечеринок
sv: Festlekar
tr: Parti Oyunları

en: Party Hats
xx: Party Hats
cs: Čepičky na oslavy
da: Festhatte
de: Partyhüte
es: Sombreros para fiestas
fr: Chapeaux de fête
it: Cappellini da festa
ja: パーティーハット
nl: Feesthoedjes
no: Selskapshatter
pl: Kapelusze imprezowe
pt: Chapéus de festa
ru: Шляпы для вечеринок
sv: Festhattar
tr: Parti Şapkaları